Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1509
Existing agreements; validity.

The State-Tribal Cooperative Agreements Act shall not affect the validity of any agreement entered into between a tribal government and a public agency prior to August 25, 1989.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 9.